Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0946.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 13b. (1) The department shall establish and administer the child care payment program to provide financial assistance to a qualified child care provider. (2) The child care payment fund is created as a restricted fund in the department of treasury to be used solely for the administration of the program. (3) The state treasurer shall credit to the fund all amounts appropriated to the fund and any other money made available to the fund from any other source for the purposes under this act. The state treasurer may solicit and accept gifts, grants, labor, loans, and other aid from any person, government, or entity. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund, including, but not limited to, federal funds, gifts, bequests, and donations. (4) Money deposited in the fund must be available for distribution by not later than January 1 of the calendar year following the distribution. The fund must not be used to meet state match requirements for federal aid or block grants. (5) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse. (6) Money available in the fund must not be expended without a specific appropriation. (7) The department shall administer the fund for auditing purposes and expend money from the fund for the purpose of administering this section. (8) The department shall distribute money in the fund to provide a bonus payment to qualified child care providers based on the number and age of eligible children in the child development and care program. Children who are older than 36 months of age must be assessed at the base bonus payment rate. Children who are 36 months of age or younger must be assessed at a rate that is double the base bonus payment rate. The department shall evaluate the number of children served under the child development and care program on October 1 of each year. The department shall determine the number of children served under the child development and care program based on the unduplicated count of children served in the 6 preceding payment periods before the department's evaluation on October 1. (9) As used in this section: (a) "Department" means the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) "Fund" means the child care payment fund created under this section. (c) "Program" means the child care payment program established under this section. (d) "Qualified child care provider" means a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home that has billed the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential for child care services under the child development and care program within the preceding 6 months after the date the department distributes money under the program. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 945 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.